Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Article 1. Prevention and Investigation.

Administrative Code. —

For codes and standards, see 13 AAC 50.

Collateral references. —

13 Am. Jur. 2d, Buildings, §§ 23 — 26

35A Am. Jur. 2d, Fires, §§ 5 — 10.

36A C.J.S., Fires, §§ 20 — 23.

39A C.J.S., Health and Environment, §§ 51, 55, 86.

Police power as authorizing statute imposing upon owner or occupant liability for expense of fighting fire starting on his land or property. 90 ALR2d 873.

Liability of one negligently causing fire for injuries sustained by person other than firefighter in attempt to control fire or to save life or property. 91 ALR3d 1202.

Sec. 18.70.010.
General function of Department of Public Safety with respect to fire protection.

The Department of Public Safety shall foster, promote, regulate, and develop ways and means of protecting life and property against fire, explosion, and panic.

History.

(§ 1 ch 66 SLA 1955)

Administrative Code. —

For codes and standards, see 13 AAC 50.

For fire service operations, see 13 AAC 52.

Sec. 18.70.020.
Duties of Department of Public Safety.

The Department of Public Safety shall

aid in the enforcement of all laws and ordinances and the regulations adopted under AS

18.70.010

—

18.70.100

and all other laws relating to fires or to fire prevention and protection;

encourage the adoption of fire prevention measures by means of education;

prepare or have prepared for dissemination information relating to the subject of fire prevention and extinguishment; and

administer the state fire-service training program, including the administration of grants for fire-service training.

History.

(§ 2 ch 66 SLA 1955; am E.O. No. 62, § 4 (1986))

Sec. 18.70.030.
Investigation of fires resulting from crime.

If there is reason to believe that a fire has resulted from crime or that crime has been committed in connection with a fire, the Department of Public Safety shall report that fact in writing to the district attorney of the judicial district in which the fire occurred.
If the fire occurred in an incorporated city with a regularly organized fire department, the investigation and report shall be made in conjunction with the fire official of that area.

History.

(§ 3 ch 66 SLA 1955)

Administrative Code. —

For fire service operations, see 13 AAC 52.

Sec. 18.70.040.
Cooperation with fire insurance companies.

The Department of Public Safety may assist, receive assistance from, and otherwise cooperate with an investigator or agent employed by a fire insurance company licensed to do business in the state, or with an investigator or agent employed by an association of insurance companies licensed to do business in the state.

History.

(§ 4 ch 66 SLA 1955)

Sec. 18.70.050.
Power of department to inspect buildings.

The Department of Public Safety may enter any building subject to regulation under AS

18.70.080

during reasonable hours for the sole purpose of inspecting the property or abating a fire hazard.

History.

(§ 5 ch 66 SLA 1955; am § 3 ch 176 SLA 1968)

Sec. 18.70.060.
Removal of property from fire.

During a fire and in the absence of the owner or claimant, the Department of Public Safety may protect personal property affected by removing it.
If the owner or claimant does not take charge of the property within 24 hours the Department of Public Safety may store it at the owner’s or claimant’s expense.

History.

(§ 1 ch 66 SLA 1955)

Sec. 18.70.070.
Abatement of fire hazards.

The Department of Public Safety may require the owner of a commercial business or public property to abate a fire hazard that exists in violation of law or regulations, and the Department of Public Safety may take appropriate action to assure abatement.

History.

(§ 7 ch 66 SLA 1955)

Administrative Code. —

For codes and standards, see 13 AAC 50.

Sec. 18.70.075.
Authority of fire department officers; penalty.

A fire officer of a municipal fire department or a fire department registered with the state fire marshal, while providing fire protection or other emergency services, has the authority to

control and direct activities at the scene of a fire or emergency;

order a person to leave a building or place in the vicinity of a fire or emergency, for the purpose of protecting the person from injury;

blockade a public highway, street, or private right-of-way temporarily while at the scene of a fire or emergency;

trespass upon property at or near the scene of a fire or emergency at any time of the day or night;

enter a building, including a private dwelling, or premises where a fire is in progress, or where there is reasonable cause to believe a fire is in progress, to extinguish the fire;

enter a building, including a private dwelling, or premises near the scene of a fire for the purpose of protecting the building or premises or for the purpose of extinguishing the fire that is in progress in another building or premises;

upon 24-hour notice to the owner or occupant, conduct a prefire planning survey in all buildings, structures, or other places within the municipality or the registered fire department’s district, except the interior of a private dwelling, where combustible material is or may become dangerous as a fire menace to the building;

direct the removal or destruction of a fence, house, motor vehicle, or other thing judged necessary to prevent the further spread of a fire.

An owner or occupant of a building or place specified in this section or any other person on the site of a fire or other fire department emergency who refuses to obey the order of a fire officer of a municipal or registered fire department in the exercise of official duties is guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction, is punishable by imprisonment for one year, or by a fine of not more than $1,000, or by both.

In this section,

“emergency” means a situation in which the services of fire department personnel are necessary or appropriate to protect life, property, or public health;

“prefire planning survey” means a limited inspection for the purpose of preparing a fire attack plan in the event of a future emergency.

History.

(§ 2 ch 215 SLA 1975; am § 1 ch 4 SLA 1987; am § 1 ch 12 SLA 2008)

Opinions of attorney general. —

The authority vested in an officer of a municipal fire department or his authorized representative under this section is not undercut by the authority of a state trooper addressed in AS

18.65.080

.
May 17, 1983 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 18.70.080.
Regulations.

The Department of Public Safety shall adopt regulations for the purpose of protecting life and property from fire and explosion by establishing minimum standards for

fire detection and suppression equipment;

fire and life safety criteria in commercial, industrial, business, institutional, or other public buildings, and buildings used for residential purposes containing four or more dwelling units;

any activity in which combustible or explosive materials are stored or handled in commercial quantities;

conditions or activities carried on outside a building described in (2) or (3) of this subsection likely to cause injury to persons or property.

The commissioner of public safety may establish by regulation and the department may charge reasonable fees for fire and life safety plan checks made to determine compliance with regulations adopted under (a)(2) of this section.

History.

(§ 8 ch 66 SLA 1955; am §§ 1, 2 ch 176 SLA 1968; am § 1 ch 23 SLA 1971; am § 38 ch 138 SLA 1986; am § 8 ch 90 SLA 1991)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2002, in (a)(4) of this section, “subsection” was substituted for “section” to conform the language to the 1986 addition of subsection (b).

Cross references. —

For provisions governing transportation of explosives, see AS

42.30.060

—

42.30.100

.

Administrative Code. —

For codes and standards, see 13 AAC 50.

Sec. 18.70.081.
Approval of fire protection systems.

Before October 30 of each year, the Department of Public Safety shall prepare and make available a list of approved fire protection systems to the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development and the public.

History.

(§ 1 ch 45 SLA 1980; am § 14 ch 58 SLA 1999)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2004, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development” in this section, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Sec. 18.70.082.
Remote housing facilities.

Any construction camp, logging camp, cannery, or oil or mining camp that has buildings not in a fire department service area in which persons are housed in dormitories or similar facilities shall be equipped with an automatic fire detection system in that portion of the building used for living or sleeping purposes.
In this section, “automatic fire detection system” means a type of automatic fire detection system approved by the state fire marshal.

History.

(§ 1 ch 65 SLA 1970)

Sec. 18.70.084.
Standard fire hose and hydrant threads required.

All fire protection equipment to be purchased by state and municipal authorities, or any other authority having charge of public property, shall be equipped with national standard fire hose threads for fire hose couplings and hydrant fittings as adopted by the state fire marshal under AS

18.70.080

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 48 SLA 1970)

Sec. 18.70.085.
Sale of nonstandard equipment.

A person may not sell or offer for sale in this state any fire engine, fire hose, hydrant, or other equipment for fire protection purposes unless the equipment is fitted and equipped according to minimum standards adopted by the state fire marshal under AS

18.70.080

. Fire equipment for special purposes or research programs, or special features of fire protection equipment found appropriate for uniformity within a particular protection area, may be exempted from this requirement by the state fire marshal.

History.

(§ 1 ch 48 SLA 1970)

Administrative Code. —

For codes and standards, see 13 AAC 50.

Sec. 18.70.090.
Enforcement authority.

The Department of Public Safety and the chief of each fire department recognized under regulations adopted by the Department of Public Safety, and their authorized representatives in their respective areas, may enforce the regulations adopted by the Department of Public Safety for the prevention of fire or for the protection of life and property against fire or panic. All state peace officers may assist the Department of Public Safety in the enforcement of AS

18.70.010

—

18.70.100

and the regulations adopted under those sections. The authority conferred in AS

18.70.010

—

18.70.100

extends to the enforcement of the provisions of AS

11.46.400

—

11.46.430

.

History.

(§ 9 ch 66 SLA 1955; am § 8 ch 117 SLA 1968; am § 20 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 1 ch 120 SLA 1990; am § 2 ch 71 SLA 1997)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1991, two cross-references to AS

18.70.300

were deleted to reflect the renumbering of that section and the fact that the section is a definition that confers no authority.

Administrative Code. —

For codes and standards, see 13 AAC 50.

Sec. 18.70.095.
Smoke and carbon monoxide detection devices.

Smoke detection devices shall be installed and maintained in all dwelling units in the state, and carbon monoxide detection devices shall be installed and maintained in all qualifying dwelling units in the state. The smoke detection devices must be of a type and shall be installed in a manner approved by the state fire marshal. The carbon monoxide detection devices must have an alarm and shall be installed and maintained according to manufacturers’ recommendations.

In a dwelling unit occupied under the terms of a rental agreement or under a month-to-month tenancy,

at the time of each occupancy, the landlord shall provide smoke detection devices and, if the dwelling unit is a qualifying dwelling unit, carbon monoxide detection devices; the devices must be in working condition, and, after notification of any deficiencies by the tenant, the landlord shall be responsible for repair or replacement; and

the tenant shall keep the devices in working condition by keeping charged batteries in battery-operated devices, if possible, by testing the devices periodically, if possible, and by refraining from permanently disabling the devices.

If a landlord did not know and had not been notified of the need to repair or replace a smoke detection device or a carbon monoxide detection device, the landlord’s failure to repair or replace the device may not be considered as evidence of negligence in a subsequent civil action arising from death, property loss, or personal injury.

In this section,

“dwelling unit” has the meaning given in AS

34.03.360

;

“landlord” has the meaning given in AS

34.03.360

;

“qualifying dwelling unit” means a dwelling unit that

contains or is serviced by a carbon-based-fueled appliance or device that produces by-products of combustion;

has an attached garage or carport; or

is adjacent to a parking space;

“rental agreement” has the meaning given in AS 34.03.360;

“tenant” has the meaning given in AS 34.03.360.

History.

(§ 1 ch 148 SLA 1975; am §§ 1, 2 ch 129 SLA 1988; am §§ 1 — 4 ch 60 SLA 2004)

Administrative Code. —

For codes and standards, see 13 AAC 50.

Sec. 18.70.100.
Criminal penalty; appeal of administrative orders.

Except as provided in (c) of this section, a person who violates a provision of AS

18.70.010

—

18.70.100

or a regulation adopted under those sections, or who fails to comply with an order issued under AS

18.70.010

—

18.70.100

, is guilty of a class B misdemeanor. When not otherwise specified, each 10 days that the violation or noncompliance continues is a separate offense.

A person aggrieved by a final order may appeal to the superior court within 30 days after the issuance of the final order. Filing of the appeal does not excuse noncompliance with the order. The court may stay the operation of the order on those terms relating to bonding or other matters that the court finds proper. A stay may not be granted or continued if the court finds that it is against the public interest.

A person who violates AS

18.70.095

, as that section relates to carbon monoxide detection devices, is guilty of a violation. In this subsection, “violation” has the meaning given in AS

11.81.900

.

History.

(§ 10 ch 66 SLA 1955; added by § 1 ch 113 SLA 1957; am § 2 ch 120 SLA 1990; am § 3 ch 71 SLA 1997; am §§ 5, 6 ch 60 SLA 2004)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1994, two references to AS

18.70.300

were deleted from subsection (a) to reflect the renumbering of that section and the fact that the section is a definition that contains no authority.

Cross references. —

For the effect of the amendment of (b) of this section on Alaska Rule of Appellate Procedure 603(a)(2), see § 5, ch. 120, SLA 1990 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

For punishment of class B misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(b)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Collateral references. —

Misuse of telephone as minor criminal offense.
97 ALR2d 503.

Validity, construction, and application of state criminal statute forbidding use of telephone to annoy or harass. 95 ALR3d 411.

Secs. 18.70.110 — 18.70.140.
Fire Escapes. [Repealed, § 2 ch 23 SLA 1971.]